Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 12. Classification of Land.

Administrative Code. —

For land planning and classification, see 11 AAC 55.

Sec. 38.05.300.
Classification of land.

The commissioner shall classify for surface use land in areas considered necessary and proper. This section does not prevent reclassification of land where the public interest warrants reclassification, nor does it preclude multiple purpose use of land whenever different uses are compatible. If the area involved contains more than 640 contiguous acres, state land, water, or land and water area may not, except by act of the state legislature, (1) be closed to multiple purpose use, or (2) be otherwise classified by the commissioner so that mining, mineral entry or location, mineral prospecting, or mineral leasing is precluded or is designated an incompatible use, except when the classification is necessary for a land disposal or exchange or is for the development of utility or transportation corridors or projects or similar projects or infrastructure, or except as allowed under (c) of this section.

[Repealed, § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994.]

Notwithstanding (a)(2) of this section, if the commissioner considers it necessary and proper, the commissioner may provide by order for an interim classification that precludes, or designates as an incompatible use, mining, mineral entry or location, mineral prospecting, or mineral leasing. Within 10 days after the convening of each regular legislative session, the commissioner shall transmit to the legislature for consideration all the interim classification orders issued under this subsection during the preceding calendar year. Unless the legislature approves by law an interim classification contained in an order transmitted under this subsection, that order expires on the 90th day of that legislative session or upon adjournment of that session, whichever occurs first. Approval by the legislature of an interim classification satisfies the requirement of (a) of this section for an act of the state legislature.

History.

(§ 1 art III ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 31 SLA 1964; am §§ 33, 34 ch 85 SLA 1979; am § 40 ch 152 SLA 1984; am §§ 2, 3 ch 52 SLA 1993; am § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

The legislature approved an interim classification closing certain state-owned land in the Glacier Creek and Winner Creek drainages to new mineral entry made under (c) of this section in § 2, ch. 8, SLA 2003 in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts.
Sections 3, 4, and 5 of that Act would have repealed sec. 2, effective April 3, 2012, “unless the commissioner of natural resources certifies to the governor and the revisor of statutes . . . that development of a resort as described in sec. 1 of this Act . . .
has begun. . . .”
On October 12, 2011, the commissioner certified to the Governor and the revisor that development has begun. The land description in § 2, ch. 8, SLA 2003 was amended by § 3, ch. 26, SLA 2012. Additional state-owned land was added to the closure area by § 2, ch. 26, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Cross references. —

For state land and water restricted to use as public recreation areas and state parks, see AS 41.21.

For statement of legislative purpose and legislative action approving an interim classification by the commissioner of natural resources closing certain land within the Glacier Creek and Winner Creek drainages near Girdwood to new mineral entry that relies on subsection (c) of this section, see ch. 8, SLA 2003 in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts, and ch. 26, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

For legislative action approving an interim classification by the commissioner of natural resources closing certain state-owned land in the proposed Bristol Bay (Alaska Peninsula) competitive oil and gas areawide lease sale to certain other oil and gas leasing that relies on (c) of this section, see ch. 9, SLA 2004, in the 2004 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For land planning and classification, see 11 AAC 55.

For grazing leases, see 11 AAC 60.

Sec. 38.05.301.
[Renumbered as AS 38.05.830.]

Sec. 38.05.305.
Notice and review. [Repealed, § 45 ch 113 SLA 1981.
For current law see AS 38.05.945.]

Sec. 38.05.310.
[Renumbered as AS 38.05.840.]

Sec. 38.05.315.
[Renumbered as AS 38.05.810.]

Sec. 38.05.320.
[Renumbered as AS 38.05.820.]

Sec. 38.05.321.
Restriction on sale, lease, or other disposal of agricultural land.

The department shall include in a document that conveys state land classified as agricultural land

a perpetual covenant for the benefit of all Alaska residents and running with the land that restricts or limits the use of the land for agricultural purposes; and

one of the following, as appropriate:

a perpetual covenant for the benefit of all Alaska residents and running with the land permitting the owner of land that had been obtained under homestead entry to subdivide and convey the land in parcels of not less than 40 acres each; or

a perpetual covenant for the benefit of all Alaska residents and running with the land permitting the owner of land that had been obtained by purchase to subdivide and convey not more than four parcels of the land of not less than 40 acres each, subject to the restriction that a subdivided parcel may not be further subdivided.

Subject to (a) of this section, state land classified as agricultural land that has been selected by a municipality under former AS 29.18.190 — 29.18.200 or former AS 29.18.205(e) may be approved by the director for patent under AS

29.65.050(c)

. Agricultural land approved for patent to a municipality shall be credited, acre for acre, toward fulfillment of that municipality’s entitlement under AS

29.65.010

—

29.65.030

or former AS 29.18.201 — 29.18.203.

The provisions of this section do not apply to

state land classified as agricultural land that has been selected by a municipality under the provisions of former AS 29.18.190 — 29.18.200 if the selection is an approved selection before April 1, 1978 and is otherwise valid under AS

29.65.050(b)

or former AS 29.18.205(b); or

a quitclaim of the interest of the state to the federal government under AS

38.05.035(b)(9)

.

For state land classified as agricultural land that is conveyed under (a) of this section,

the commissioner may require the landowner to cooperate with the appropriate soil and water conservation district under AS 41.10 in the development and implementation of soil conservation plans as authorized by AS

41.10.110

(6);

as a condition of the conveyance, the commissioner may not require preparation and implementation of a schedule of planned agricultural development or a farm development plan specified in a land purchase contract unless the commissioner permits modification of a plan in cases of economic hardship or other extenuating circumstances;

the commissioner may not

limit the right of the landowner to use the land and improvements for purposes that are incidental to and not inconsistent with the primary use of the land for agricultural purposes;

except as provided by (i) of this section, limit the right of a landowner to construct housing for the landowner and farm laborers, to construct improvements for animals, or to construct improvements that are reasonably required for or related to agricultural use on the original parcel and on additional subdivided parcels, not to exceed the limits and restrictions set by (a)(2) of this section; and

limit the right of the landowner to subdivide and convey the land if the resulting parcels are not in violation of the limits and restrictions set out in (a)(2) of this section.

A landowner may subdivide land classified for agricultural use and for which the landowner obtained a patent under a homestead entry permit issued under AS 38.09 so long as the resulting parcels are not in violation of the minimum parcel size set out in (a) of this section. A landowner may subdivide other land classified for agricultural use as authorized under (d)(3)(C) of this section. If the subdivision involves land classified for agricultural use and for which the landowner obtained a patent under a homestead entry permit issued under AS 38.09, or if the subdivision of land authorized under (d)(3)(C) of this section results only in parcels of 640 acres or more, the landowner may subdivide without payment as required by this subsection. If subdivision of land authorized by (d)(3)(C) of this section would result in one or more parcels of less than 640 acres, the landowner may subdivide only if the landowner first tenders payment to the department for the right to construct housing in each subdivided parcel of less than 640 acres. Payments collected under this subsection shall be separately accounted for and may be appropriated to the agricultural revolving loan fund (AS

03.10.040

). For purposes of this subsection, the value of the right to construct housing in a subdivided parcel

is $4,000 for the parcel, subject to adjustment under (h) of this section; or

shall be determined by an appraisal made by an appraiser under contract to the landowner owning the parcel, and the appraisal must include the value, determined as of the date of subdivision, of the right to construct housing by the landowner under (d)(3) of this section.

Notwithstanding (e) of this section, the landowner is not required to pay an amount due under (e) of this section until the subdivided parcel is conveyed by the owner to a person not a member of the person’s immediate family. The department has a lien on the parcel as security for payment of the amount due. For purposes of this subsection, “immediate family” means

the spouse of the person; or

a parent, child, including a stepchild and an adopted child, or sibling of the person if the parent, child, or sibling resides with the person, is financially dependent on the person, or shares a substantial financial interest with the person.

A perpetual covenant described in (a) of this section may be enforced only by a civil action brought by the state, a municipality, or a resident. If a municipality or a resident brings an action under this subsection, the municipality or resident shall also serve a copy of the summons and complaint on the state in the manner prescribed by the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure for service on the state. An action may be maintained under this subsection only if

commenced within six years after the cause of action has accrued; and

the plaintiff has first notified in writing the appropriate soil and water conservation district under AS 41.10 of the violation of the covenant at least 90 days before the civil action is filed.

The value of the right to construct housing determined under (e) of this section shall be adjusted to correspond with the change in the consumer price index for all urban consumers for the Anchorage Metropolitan Area compiled by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, United States Department of Labor. The base year for the computation shall be the calendar year in which the process of conveyance of state land authorized by (a) of this section is initiated under this section.

The authority given in (d)(3)(B) of this section to construct housing and the payment required under (e) of this section for the right to construct housing do not permit the landowner the right to construct condominiums under AS 34.07 or other common interest ownership communities under AS 34.08.

In this section, “agricultural purposes” means

the production, for commercial or personal use, of useful plants and animals;

the construction of

housing for landowners and farm laborers;

improvements for animals; or

improvements that are reasonably required for or related to agricultural use;

the use of gravel reasonably required or related to agricultural production on the parcel conveyed; and

removal and disposition of timber in order to bring agricultural land into use.

History.

(§ 3 ch 71 SLA 1976; am § 3 ch 180 SLA 1978; am § 43 ch 152 SLA 1984; am §§ 59, 60 ch 74 SLA 1985; am §§ 9 — 11 ch 1 FSSLA 1996; am §§ 9 — 11 ch 20 SLA 1997; am § 25 ch 81 SLA 2000; am § 17 ch 9 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1984 “former” was inserted before the references to AS 29.18.190 — 29.18.200 in subsections (b) and (c). Those sections were repealed by § 5, ch. 180, SLA 1978.

Cross references. —

For provision directing the commissioner of natural resources to issue a patent for the remaining interest in the land estate to the owner of rights to that land for agricultural purposes under certain conditions, notwithstanding this section, see § 1, ch. 37, SLA 2006, in the 2006 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For land planning and classification, see 11 AAC 55.

For homesteads, see 11 AAC 67, art. 6A.

For disposal of agricultural interest, see 11 AAC 67, art. 7.

For land exchanges, see 11 AAC 67, art. 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective April 23, 2014, in (f)(2), substituted “an adopted child” for “an adoptive child”.

Editor’s notes. —

On June 7, 1996, the enactment of CSSB 162(FIN) (Nineteenth Legislature, Second Session), designated as ch. 1, FSSLA 1996, became the subject of a lawsuit relating to the legislative override of the governor’s veto of that bill. On April 16, 1997, the superior court issued a Final Declaratory Judgment stating that the governor’s veto of CSSB 162(FIN) “was not timely overridden by the Alaska Legislature” and that “CSSB 162(FIN) was not enacted into law.”

Honorable Tony Knowles v. Legislative Council

, No. 1JU 96-1276 CI (Sup. Ct. Apr. 16, 1997). On appeal, the Alaska Supreme Court vacated the judgment and directed the superior court to dismiss the action, concluding that the matter was an action brought in the name of the state against the legislature in violation of article III, sec. 16 of the Alaska Constitution.

Legislative Council v. Knowles

, 988 P.2d 604 (Alaska 1999).

The provisions of Sections 9, 10, and 11, ch. 20 SLA 1997, are given effect. The provisions of sec. 10, ch. 20, SLA 1997 are identical to the 1996 provisions of sec. 10 of CSSB 162(FIN). The provisions of secs. 9 and 11, ch. 20, SLA 1997 are similar but not identical to secs. 9 and 11 of CSSB 162(FIN).

Sec. 38.05.323.
[Renumbered as AS 38.05.821.]

Sec. 38.05.325.
Homestead entry. [Repealed, § 45 ch 85 SLA 1979.
For current law see AS 38.09.]

Sec. 38.05.330.
[Renumbered as AS 38.05.850.]

Sec. 38.05.335.
[Renumbered as AS 38.05.860.]

Sec. 38.05.340.
[Renumbered as AS 38.05.920.]

Sec. 38.05.345.
[Renumbered as AS 38.05.945.]

Sec. 38.05.346.
[Renumbered as AS 38.05.946.]

Sec. 38.05.347.
Transfer of state land to cities. [Repealed, § 6 ch 218 SLA 1976; § 15 ch 257 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 38.05.348.
[Renumbered as AS 38.05.870.]

Sec. 38.05.349.
[Renumbered as AS 38.05.872.]

Sec. 38.05.350.
[Renumbered as AS 38.05.910.]

Sec. 38.05.351.
[Renumbered as AS 38.05.930.]

Sec. 38.05.355.
[Renumbered as AS 38.05.950.]

Sec. 38.05.360.
Waste or injury to land. [Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978. For current law see AS 11.46.]

Sec. 38.05.362.
Agricultural land classification. [Repealed, § 88 ch 152 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 38.05.365.
[Renumbered as AS 38.05.965.]

Sec. 38.05.370.
[Renumbered as AS 38.05.990.]